Illinois, session 104th, HB4312.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 112A-3, 112A-5.5, 112A-14, and 6112A-20 as follows: 7    (725 ILCS 5/112A-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-3)8    Sec. 112A-3. Definitions.9    (a) In this Article:10    "Advocate" means a person whose communications with the 11victim are privileged under Section 8-802.1 or 8-802.2 of the 12Code of Civil Procedure or Section 227 of the Illinois 13Domestic Violence Act of 1986.14    "Named victim" means the person named as the victim in the 15delinquency petition or criminal prosecution.16    "Protective order" means a domestic violence order of 17protection, a civil no contact order, or a stalking no contact 18order.19    (b) For the purposes of domestic violence cases, the 20following terms shall have the following meanings in this 21Article: 22        (1) "Abuse" means physical abuse, harassment, 23    intimidation of a dependent, interference with personal   HB4312- 2 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    liberty or willful deprivation but does not include 2    reasonable direction of a minor child by a parent or 3    person in loco parentis.4        (2) "Domestic violence" means abuse as described in 5    paragraph (1) of this subsection (b).6        (3) "Family or household members" include spouses, 7    former spouses, parents, children, stepchildren, and other 8    persons related by blood or by present or prior marriage, 9    persons who share or formerly shared a common dwelling, 10    persons who have or allegedly have a child in common, 11    persons who share or allegedly share a blood relationship 12    through a child, persons who have or have had a dating or 13    engagement relationship, persons with disabilities and 14    their personal assistants, and caregivers as defined in 15    subsection (e) of Section 12-4.4a of the Criminal Code of 16    2012. For purposes of this paragraph (3), neither a casual 17    acquaintanceship nor ordinary fraternization between 2 18    individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed 19    to constitute a dating relationship.20        (4) "Harassment" means knowing conduct which is not 21    necessary to accomplish a purpose which is reasonable 22    under the circumstances; would cause a reasonable person 23    emotional distress; and does cause emotional distress to 24    the petitioner. Unless the presumption is rebutted by a 25    preponderance of the evidence, the following types of 26    conduct shall be presumed to cause emotional distress:  HB4312- 3 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            (i) creating a disturbance at petitioner's place 2        of employment or school;3            (ii) engaging in doxing as defined in the Civil 4        Liability for Doxing Act repeatedly telephoning 5        petitioner's place of employment, home or residence;6            (iii) repeatedly following the petitioner 7        including, but not limited to, directly or indirectly 8        through third parties, by using an electronic tracking 9        or monitoring device, a system or other electronic 10        means, or acquiring tracking information to determine 11        the petitioner's location, movement, or travel 12        patterns without the petitioner's knowledge or consent 13        about in a public place or places;14            (iv) non-consensual creation, dissemination, or 15        threatening the dissemination of electronically 16        generated or digitally altered content directly or 17        indirectly pertaining to the petitioner or to the 18        likeness of the petitioner including, but not limited 19        to, images of the petitioner or the petitioner's voice 20        repeatedly keeping petitioner under surveillance by 21        remaining present outside his or her home, school, 22        place of employment, vehicle or other place occupied 23        by petitioner or by peering in petitioner's windows;24            (v) repeatedly surveilling the petitioner directly 25        or indirectly including, but not limited to, by 26        remaining present at or outside the petitioner's home,   HB4312- 4 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        school, place of employment, vehicle, or other place 2        occupied by petitioner, by peering in petitioner's 3        windows, through an electronic tracking or monitoring 4        device, a system or other electronic means, or by 5        acquiring tracking information to determine the 6        petitioner's location, movement, or travel patterns 7        without the petitioner's knowledge and consent; 8            (vi) non-consensual creation, dissemination or 9        threatening the non-consensual dissemination of 10        private sexual images and digitally altered sexual 11        images as defined in the Civil Remedies for 12        Nonconsensual Dissemination of Private Sexual Images 13        Act;14            (vii) repeatedly contacting the petitioner 15        directly or indirectly through any means including, 16        but not limited to, telephonic, electronic, or online;17            (viii) using an electronic tracking or monitoring, 18        device, a system or other electronic means, or 19        acquiring tracking information to determine the 20        petitioner's location, movement, or travel patterns 21        without the petitioner's knowledge or consent; 22            (ix) improperly concealing a minor child from 23        petitioner, repeatedly threatening to improperly 24        remove a minor child of petitioner's from the 25        jurisdiction or from the physical care of petitioner, 26        repeatedly threatening to conceal a minor child from   HB4312- 5 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        petitioner, or making a single such threat following 2        an actual or attempted improper removal or 3        concealment, unless respondent was fleeing from an 4        incident or pattern of domestic violence; or5            (x) (vi) threatening physical force, confinement 6        or restraint on one or more occasions.7        (5) "Interference with personal liberty" means 8    committing or threatening physical abuse, harassment, 9    intimidation or willful deprivation so as to compel 10    another to engage in conduct from which she or he has a 11    right to abstain or to refrain from conduct in which she or 12    he has a right to engage.13        (6) "Intimidation of a dependent" means subjecting a 14    person who is dependent because of age, health, or 15    disability to participation in or the witnessing of: 16    physical force against another or physical confinement or 17    restraint of another which constitutes physical abuse as 18    defined in this Article, regardless of whether the abused 19    person is a family or household member.20        (7) "Order of protection" or "domestic violence order 21    of protection" means an ex parte or final order, granted 22    pursuant to this Article, which includes any or all of the 23    remedies authorized by Section 112A-14 of this Code.24        (8) "Petitioner" may mean not only any named 25    petitioner for the domestic violence order of protection 26    and any named victim of abuse on whose behalf the petition   HB4312- 6 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    is brought, but also any other person protected by this 2    Article.3        (9) "Physical abuse" includes sexual abuse and means 4    any of the following:5            (i) knowing or reckless use of physical force, 6        confinement or restraint;7            (ii) knowing, repeated and unnecessary sleep 8        deprivation; or9            (iii) knowing or reckless conduct which creates an 10        immediate risk of physical harm.11        (9.3) "Respondent" in a petition for a domestic 12    violence order of protection means the defendant. 13        (9.5) "Stay away" means for the respondent to refrain 14    from both physical presence and nonphysical contact with 15    the petitioner whether direct, indirect (including, but 16    not limited to, telephone calls, mail, email, faxes, and 17    written notes), or through third parties who may or may 18    not know about the domestic violence order of protection. 19        (10) "Willful deprivation" means wilfully denying a 20    person who because of age, health or disability requires 21    medication, medical care, shelter, accessible shelter or 22    services, food, therapeutic device, or other physical 23    assistance, and thereby exposing that person to the risk 24    of physical, mental or emotional harm, except with regard 25    to medical care and treatment when such dependent person 26    has expressed the intent to forgo such medical care or   HB4312- 7 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    treatment. This paragraph (10) does not create any new 2    affirmative duty to provide support to dependent persons.3    (c) For the purposes of cases involving sexual offenses, 4the following terms shall have the following meanings in this 5Article:6        (1) "Civil no contact order" means an ex parte or 7    final order granted under this Article, which includes a 8    remedy authorized by Section 112A-14.5 of this Code.9        (2) "Family or household members" include spouses, 10    parents, children, stepchildren, and persons who share a 11    common dwelling.12        (3) "Non-consensual" means a lack of freely given 13    agreement.14        (4) "Petitioner" means not only any named petitioner 15    for the civil no contact order and any named victim of 16    non-consensual sexual conduct or non-consensual sexual 17    penetration on whose behalf the petition is brought, but 18    includes any other person sought to be protected under 19    this Article.20        (5) "Respondent" in a petition for a civil no contact 21    order means the defendant.22        (6) "Sexual conduct" means any intentional or knowing 23    touching or fondling by the petitioner or the respondent, 24    either directly or through clothing, of the sex organs, 25    anus, or breast of the petitioner or the respondent, or 26    any part of the body of a child under 13 years of age, or   HB4312- 8 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    any transfer or transmission of semen by the respondent 2    upon any part of the clothed or unclothed body of the 3    petitioner, for the purpose of sexual gratification or 4    arousal of the petitioner or the respondent.5        (7) "Sexual penetration" means any contact, however 6    slight, between the sex organ or anus of one person by an 7    object, the sex organ, mouth or anus of another person, or 8    any intrusion, however slight, of any part of the body of 9    one person or of any animal or object into the sex organ or 10    anus of another person, including, but not limited to, 11    cunnilingus, fellatio, or anal penetration. Evidence of 12    emission of semen is not required to prove sexual 13    penetration.14        (8) "Stay away" means to refrain from both physical 15    presence and nonphysical contact with the petitioner 16    directly, indirectly, or through third parties who may or 17    may not know of the order. "Nonphysical contact" includes, 18    but is not limited to, telephone calls, mail, e-mail, fax, 19    and written notes. 20    (d) For the purposes of cases involving stalking offenses, 21the following terms shall have the following meanings in this 22Article:23        (1) "Course of conduct" means 2 or more acts, 24    including, but not limited to, acts in which a respondent 25    directly, indirectly, or through third parties, by any 26    action, method, device, or means follows, monitors,   HB4312- 9 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    observes, surveils, threatens, or communicates to or 2    about, a person, engages in other contact, or interferes 3    with or damages a person's property or pet. A course of 4    conduct may include contact via electronic communications. 5    The incarceration of a person in a penal institution who 6    commits the course of conduct is not a bar to prosecution.7        (2) "Emotional distress" means significant mental 8    suffering, anxiety, or alarm.9        (3) "Contact" includes any contact with the victim, 10    that is initiated or continued without the victim's 11    consent, or that is in disregard of the victim's expressed 12    desire that the contact be avoided or discontinued, 13    including, but not limited to, being in the physical 14    presence of the victim; appearing within the sight of the 15    victim; approaching or confronting the victim in a public 16    place or on private property; appearing at the workplace 17    or residence of the victim; entering onto or remaining on 18    property owned, leased, or occupied by the victim; or 19    placing an object on, or delivering an object to, property 20    owned, leased, or occupied by the victim.21        (4) "Petitioner" means any named petitioner for the 22    stalking no contact order or any named victim of stalking 23    on whose behalf the petition is brought.24        (5) "Reasonable person" means a person in the 25    petitioner's circumstances with the petitioner's knowledge 26    of the respondent and the respondent's prior acts.  HB4312- 10 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        (6) "Respondent" in a petition for a civil no contact 2    order means the defendant. 3        (7) "Stalking" means engaging in a course of conduct 4    directed at a specific person, and he or she knows or 5    should know that this course of conduct would cause a 6    reasonable person to fear for his or her safety or the 7    safety of a third person or suffer emotional distress. 8    "Stalking" does not include an exercise of the right to 9    free speech or assembly that is otherwise lawful or 10    picketing occurring at the workplace that is otherwise 11    lawful and arises out of a bona fide labor dispute, 12    including any controversy concerning wages, salaries, 13    hours, working conditions or benefits, including health 14    and welfare, sick leave, insurance, and pension or 15    retirement provisions, the making or maintaining of 16    collective bargaining agreements, and the terms to be 17    included in those agreements.18        (8) "Stalking no contact order" means an ex parte or 19    final order granted under this Article, which includes a 20    remedy authorized by Section 112A-14.7 of this Code. 21(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18; 100-597, eff. 6-29-18.) 22    (725 ILCS 5/112A-5.5)23    Sec. 112A-5.5. Time for filing petition; service on 24respondent, hearing on petition, and default orders. 25    (a) A petition for a protective order may be filed at any   HB4312- 11 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1time, in person or online, after a criminal charge or 2delinquency petition is filed and before the charge or 3delinquency petition is dismissed, the defendant or juvenile 4is acquitted, or the defendant or juvenile completes service 5of his or her sentence.6    (b) The request for an ex parte protective order may be 7considered without notice to the respondent under Section 8112A-17.5 of this Code.9    (c) A summons shall be issued and served for a protective 10order. The summons may be served by delivery to the respondent 11personally in open court in the criminal or juvenile 12delinquency proceeding, in the form prescribed by subsection 13(d) of Supreme Court Rule 101, except that it shall require the 14respondent to answer or appear within 7 days. Attachments to 15the summons shall include the petition for protective order, 16supporting affidavits, if any, and any ex parte protective 17order that has been issued.18    (d) The summons shall be served by the sheriff or other law 19enforcement officer at the earliest time available and shall 20take precedence over any other summons, except those of a 21similar emergency nature. Attachments to the summons shall 22include the petition for protective order, supporting 23affidavits, if any, and any ex parte protective order that has 24been issued. Special process servers may be appointed at any 25time and their designation shall not affect the 26responsibilities and authority of the sheriff or other   HB4312- 12 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1official process servers. In a county with a population over 23,000,000, a special process server may not be appointed if 3the protective order grants the surrender of a child, the 4surrender of a firearm or Firearm Owner's Identification Card, 5or the exclusive possession of a shared residence.6    (e) If the respondent is not served within 30 days of the 7filing of the petition, the court shall schedule a court 8proceeding on the issue of service. Either the petitioner, the 9petitioner's counsel, or the State's Attorney shall appear and 10the court shall either order continued attempts at personal 11service or shall order service by publication, in accordance 12with Sections 2-203, 2-206, and 2-207 of the Code of Civil 13Procedure.14    (f) The request for a final protective order can be 15considered at any court proceeding in the delinquency or 16criminal case after service of the petition. If the petitioner 17has not been provided notice of the court proceeding at least 1810 days in advance of the proceeding, the court shall schedule 19a hearing on the petition and provide notice to the 20petitioner.21    (f-5) A court in a county with a population above 250,000 22shall offer the option of a remote hearing to a petitioner for 23a protective order. The court has the discretion to grant or 24deny the request for a remote hearing for good cause shown. 25Each court shall determine the procedure for a remote hearing. 26The petitioner, applicable witnesses, and respondent may   HB4312- 13 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1appear remotely or in person.2    The court shall issue and publish a court order, standing 3order, or local rule detailing information about the process 4for requesting and participating in a remote court appearance. 5The court order, standing order, or local rule shall be 6published on the court's website and posted on signs 7throughout the courthouse, including in the clerk's office. 8The sign shall be written in plain language and include 9information about the availability of remote court appearances 10and the process for requesting a remote hearing. 11    (g) Default orders.12        (1) A final domestic violence order of protection may 13    be entered by default:14            (A) for any of the remedies sought in the 15        petition, if the respondent has been served with 16        documents under subsection (b) or (c) of this Section 17        and if the respondent fails to appear on the specified 18        return date or any subsequent hearing date agreed to 19        by the petitioner and respondent or set by the court; 20        or21            (B) for any of the remedies provided under 22        paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), 23        (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), or (18) of subsection 24        (b) of Section 112A-14 of this Code, or if the 25        respondent fails to answer or appear in accordance 26        with the date set in the publication notice or the   HB4312- 14 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        return date indicated on the service of a household 2        member.3        (2) A final civil no contact order may be entered by 4    default for any of the remedies provided in Section 5    112A-14.5 of this Code, if the respondent has been served 6    with documents under subsection (b) or (c) of this 7    Section, and if the respondent fails to answer or appear 8    in accordance with the date set in the publication notice 9    or the return date indicated on the service of a household 10    member.11        (3) A final stalking no contact order may be entered 12    by default for any of the remedies provided by Section 13    112A-14.7 of this Code, if the respondent has been served 14    with documents under subsection (b) or (c) of this Section 15    and if the respondent fails to answer or appear in 16    accordance with the date set in the publication notice or 17    the return date indicated on the service of a household 18    member. 19(Source: P.A. 102-853, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 20    (725 ILCS 5/112A-14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-14)21    Sec. 112A-14. Domestic violence order of protection; 22remedies. 23    (a) (Blank).24    (b) The court may order any of the remedies listed in this 25subsection (b). The remedies listed in this subsection (b)   HB4312- 15 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1shall be in addition to other civil or criminal remedies 2available to petitioner.3        (1) Prohibition of abuse. Prohibit respondent's 4    harassment, interference with personal liberty, 5    intimidation of a dependent, physical abuse, or willful 6    deprivation, as defined in this Article, if such abuse has 7    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 8    prohibited.9            (A) Require the respondent to cease harassment.10            (B) Require the respondent to:11                (i) stop creating, using, and disseminating; 12            remove; and delete the following harassing 13            conduct:14                    (a) any and all material or statements 15                that constitute harassment under this Act, 16                including, but not limited to, doxing, 17                electronically generated or digitally altered 18                content, sexual private images, and digitally 19                altered sexual images; and20                    (b) any and all electronic tracking or 21                monitoring devices, system or other electronic 22                means, or tracking information; and23                (ii) present sufficient evidence that such 24            compliance has occurred. 25        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 26    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any   HB4312- 16 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 2    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 3    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 4    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 5    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 6    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 7    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 8    Marriage Act.9            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 10        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 11        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 12        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 13        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 14        person or entity other than the opposing party that 15        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 16        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 17        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.18            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 19        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 20        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 21        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 22        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 23        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 24        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 25        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 26        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the   HB4312- 17 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 2        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 3        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 4        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 5        the accessibility of the residence or household. 6        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 7        have a right to occupancy.8            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 9        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 10        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 11        that the hardships to respondent substantially 12        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 13        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 14        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 15        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 16        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 17        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 18        household.19        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 20    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 21    person protected by the domestic violence order of 22    protection, or prohibit respondent from entering or 23    remaining present at petitioner's school, place of 24    employment, or other specified places at times when 25    petitioner is present, or both, if reasonable, given the 26    balance of hardships. Hardships need not be balanced for   HB4312- 18 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    the court to enter a stay away order or prohibit entry if 2    respondent has no right to enter the premises.3            (A) If a domestic violence order of protection 4        grants petitioner exclusive possession of the 5        residence, prohibits respondent from entering the 6        residence, or orders respondent to stay away from 7        petitioner or other protected persons, then the court 8        may allow respondent access to the residence to remove 9        items of clothing and personal adornment used 10        exclusively by respondent, medications, and other 11        items as the court directs. The right to access shall 12        be exercised on only one occasion as the court directs 13        and in the presence of an agreed-upon adult third 14        party or law enforcement officer.15            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 16        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 17        middle, or high school, the court when issuing a 18        domestic violence order of protection and providing 19        relief shall consider the severity of the act, any 20        continuing physical danger or emotional distress to 21        the petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to 22        the petitioner and respondent under federal and State 23        law, the availability of a transfer of the respondent 24        to another school, a change of placement or a change of 25        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 26        and educational disruption that would be caused by a   HB4312- 19 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 2        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 3        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 4        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 5        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 6        change of placement or change of program, as 7        determined by the school district or private or 8        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 9        respondent's movements within the school attended by 10        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 11        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 12        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 13        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 14        bears the burden of production with respect to the 15        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 16        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 17        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 18        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 19        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 20        agree with the school district's or private or 21        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 22        change of program or solely on the ground that the 23        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 24        does not take an action required to effectuate a 25        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 26        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the   HB4312- 20 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 2        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 3        another attendance center within the respondent's 4        school district or private or non-public school, the 5        school district or private or non-public school shall 6        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 7        center to which the respondent is transferred. If the 8        court order results in a transfer of the minor 9        respondent to another attendance center, a change in 10        the respondent's placement, or a change of the 11        respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or legal 12        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 13        transportation and other costs associated with the 14        transfer or change.15            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 16        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 17        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 18        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. If 19        the court orders a transfer of the respondent to 20        another school, the parents, guardian, or legal 21        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 22        transportation and other costs associated with the 23        change of school by the respondent. 24        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 25    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 26    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist,   HB4312- 21 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 2    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 3    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 4    domestic violence abusers, or any other guidance service 5    the court deems appropriate. The court may order the 6    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 7    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 8    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 9    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 10        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 11    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 12    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 13    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 14    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 15    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 16    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 17    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 18    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 19    in loco parentis.20        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 21    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 22    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding physical care to 23    respondent would not be in the minor child's best 24    interest.25        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities 26    and significant decision-making responsibilities. Award   HB4312- 22 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    temporary significant decision-making responsibility to 2    petitioner in accordance with this Section, the Illinois 3    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the Illinois 4    Parentage Act of 2015, and this State's Uniform 5    Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. 6        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 7    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 8    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding temporary 9    significant decision-making responsibility to respondent 10    would not be in the child's best interest.11        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 12    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 13    physical care or temporary significant decision-making 14    responsibility of a minor child to petitioner. The court 15    shall restrict or deny respondent's parenting time with a 16    minor child if the court finds that respondent has done or 17    is likely to do any of the following:18            (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 19        parenting time;20            (ii) use the parenting time as an opportunity to 21        abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's family or 22        household members;23            (iii) improperly conceal or detain the minor 24        child; or25            (iv) otherwise act in a manner that is not in the 26        best interests of the minor child.   HB4312- 23 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        The court shall not be limited by the standards set 2    forth in Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and 3    Dissolution of Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting 4    time, the order shall specify dates and times for the 5    parenting time to take place or other specific parameters 6    or conditions that are appropriate. No order for parenting 7    time shall refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting 8    time". Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 9    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 10    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 11    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 12    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 13    in a violent or abusive manner. If necessary to protect 14    any member of petitioner's family or household from future 15    abuse, respondent shall be prohibited from coming to 16    petitioner's residence to meet the minor child for 17    parenting time, and the petitioner and respondent shall 18    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 19    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 20    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 21    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 22    acknowledging accountability to the court.23        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 24    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 25    concealing the child within the State.26        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in   HB4312- 24 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 2    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 3    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner, or to 4    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 5    child or the respondent.6        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 7    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 8    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 9    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:10            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 11        property; or12            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 13        property jointly; sharing it would risk abuse of 14        petitioner by respondent or is impracticable; and the 15        balance of hardships favors temporary possession by 16        petitioner.17        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 18    property is that it is marital property, the court may 19    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 20    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 21    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 22    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 23    hereafter amended.24        No order under this provision shall affect title to 25    property.26        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent   HB4312- 25 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 2    damaging, or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 3    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 4    if:5            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 6        property; or7            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 8        property jointly, and the balance of hardships favors 9        granting this remedy.10        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 11    property is that it is marital property, the court may 12    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 13    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 14    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 15    now or hereafter amended.16        The court may further prohibit respondent from 17    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 18    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 19    advantage of respondent or of any other person.20        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 21    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 22    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 23    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 24    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 25    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 26    animal and forbid the respondent from taking,   HB4312- 26 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 2    otherwise disposing of the animal. 3        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 4    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 5    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 6    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 7    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 8    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 9    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 10    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 11    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 12    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 13    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 14    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 15    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 16    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 17    responsibility differently and vacating petitioner's 18    significant decision-making responsibility unless 19    otherwise provided in the order.20        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 21    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 22    the abuse. Such losses shall include, but not be limited 23    to, medical expenses, lost earnings or other support, 24    repair or replacement of property damaged or taken, 25    reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and moving or 26    other travel expenses, including additional reasonable   HB4312- 27 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    expenses for temporary shelter and restaurant meals.2            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 3        entitled to seek maintenance, child support, or 4        property distribution from the other party under the 5        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 6        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 7        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 8        the extent that such reimbursement would be 9        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 10        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.11            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 12        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 13        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 14        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 15        and recovery of the minor child, including, but not 16        limited to, legal fees, court costs, private 17        investigator fees, and travel costs.18        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 19    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 20    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 21    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 22    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.23        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 24    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearm 25    parts. 26            (A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph   HB4312- 28 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        (B-2), if applicable, a person who is subject to an 2        existing domestic violence order of protection issued 3        under this Code may not lawfully possess firearms or 4        firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 5        operable firearm or a Firearm Owner's Identification 6        Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 7        Identification Card Act.8            (B) Any firearms in the possession of the 9        respondent, except as provided in subparagraph (C) of 10        this paragraph (14.5) and subject to the provisions of 11        subparagraph (B-2), if applicable, shall be ordered by 12        the court to be surrendered to law enforcement for 13        safekeeping. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 14        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 15        be immediately surrendered to the serving officers at 16        the time of service of the order of protection, and any 17        other firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered 18        to local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 19        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 20        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 21        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 22        subparagraph (C), shall also be ordered by the court 23        to be turned over to serving officers at the time of 24        service of the order of protection or, if not on the 25        respondent's person or at the location where the 26        respondent is served at the time of service, to local   HB4312- 29 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 2        order. The law enforcement agency shall immediately 3        mail the card, as well as any license, to the Illinois 4        State Police Firearm Owner's Identification Card 5        Office for safekeeping. 6            (B-1) Upon request of the petitioner or the 7        State's Attorney on behalf of the petitioner, a law 8        enforcement officer may seek a search warrant based on 9        the allegations in the petition for the Order of 10        Protection. 11                (i) If requested by law enforcement, the court 12            shall issue a search warrant for the seizure of 13            any firearms or firearm parts that could be 14            assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to 15            the respondent at or after entry of an order of 16            protection if the court, based upon sworn 17            testimony and governed by Sections 108-3 and 18            108-4, finds probable cause exists that: 19                    (aa) the respondent poses an immediate and 20                present credible threat to the physical safety 21                of the petitioner protected by the order of 22                protection; 23                    (bb) the respondent possesses firearms or 24                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 25                an operable firearm; and26                    (cc) the firearms or firearm parts that   HB4312- 30 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 2                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 3                other property of the respondent to be 4                searched. 5                (ii) The search warrant shall specify with 6            particularity the scope of the search, including 7            the property to be searched, and shall direct the 8            law enforcement agency to seize the respondent's 9            firearms and firearm parts that could be assembled 10            to make an operable firearm. Law enforcement shall 11            also be directed to seize into their possession 12            any Firearm Owner's Identification Card and any 13            Concealed Carry License belonging to the 14            respondent. 15                (iii) The law enforcement agency to which the 16            court has directed the warrant shall execute the 17            warrant no later than 96 hours after issuance. The 18            law enforcement agency to which the court has 19            directed the warrant may coordinate with other law 20            enforcement agencies to execute the warrant. A 21            return of the warrant shall be filed by the law 22            enforcement agency within 24 hours of execution, 23            setting forth the time, date, and location where 24            the warrant was executed and what items, if any, 25            were seized. If the court is not in session, the 26            return information shall be returned on the next   HB4312- 31 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            date the court is in session. Subject to the 2            provisions of this Section, peace officers shall 3            have the same authority to execute a warrant 4            issued under this subsection as a warrant issued 5            under Article 108.6                (iv) If the property to be searched is in 7            another county, the petitioner or the State's 8            Attorney may seek a search warrant in that county 9            with the law enforcement agency with primary 10            responsibility for responding to service calls at 11            the property to be searched. Regardless of whether 12            the petitioner is working with the State's 13            Attorney under subsection (d) of Section 112A-4.5, 14            the petitioner may request the State's Attorney's 15            assistance to request that the law enforcement 16            agency in the county where the property is located 17            seek a search warrant.18                (v) Service of an order of protection shall, 19            to the extent possible, be concurrent with any 20            warrant issued under this paragraph.21            (B-2) Ex parte relief may be granted under this 22        paragraph (14.5) only if the court finds that personal 23        injury to the petitioner is likely to occur if the 24        respondent received prior notice and if the petitioner 25        has otherwise satisfied the requirements of Section 26        112A-17.5 of this Article.   HB4312- 32 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            (C) If the respondent is a peace officer as 2        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 3        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 4        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 5        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 6        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 7        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 8        for safekeeping for the duration of the domestic 9        violence order of protection.10            (D)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 11        assembled to make an operable firearm that have been 12        seized or surrendered shall be kept by the law 13        enforcement agency that took possession of the items 14        for safekeeping, except as provided in subparagraph 15        (C), (E), or (F). The period of safekeeping shall be 16        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 17        provided in subparagraph (F), the respondent is 18        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 19        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 20        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 21        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 22        the court describing any seized or surrendered 23        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 24        that the respondent may seek the return of the 25        respondent's items at the end of the order of 26        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter   HB4312- 33 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 2        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 3        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 4        under this subsection.5            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 6        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 7        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 8        and to notify the Illinois State Police Firearm 9        Owner's Identification Card Office at the end of the 10        Order of Protection.11            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 12        respondent may request the return of any seized or 13        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 14        assembled to make an operable firearm. Seized or 15        surrendered firearms or firearm parts shall be 16        returned within 14 days of the request to the 17        respondent, if the respondent is lawfully eligible to 18        possess firearms, or to a designated third party who 19        is lawfully eligible to possess firearms. If the 20        firearms or firearm parts cannot be returned to 21        respondent because (1) the respondent has not 22        requested the return or transfer of the firearms or 23        firearm parts as set forth in this subparagraph and 24        (2) the respondent cannot be located or fails to 25        respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve the 26        firearms, upon petition from the appropriate law   HB4312- 34 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        enforcement agency and notice to the respondent at the 2        respondent's last known address, the court may order 3        the law enforcement agency to destroy the firearms or 4        firearm parts; use the firearms or firearm parts for 5        training purposes, or for any other application as 6        deemed appropriate by the law enforcement agency; or 7        turn over the firearms or firearm parts to a third 8        party who is lawfully eligible to possess firearms, 9        and who does not reside with respondent. 10            (E)(i) If a person other than the respondent 11        claims title to any firearms or firearm parts that 12        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 13        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 14        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 15        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 16        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 17        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 18        petition, the court determines the person to be the 19        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 20        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 21        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 22        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 23        person, provided that: 24                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 25            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 26            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or   HB4312- 35 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            possession, and the lawful owner agrees to store 2            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 3            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 4            such that the respondent does not have access to 5            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 6            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 7            and 8                (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 9            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 10            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 11            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 12        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 13        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 14        affirm by affidavit that he or she:15                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 16            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 17            operable firearm;18                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 19            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 20            operable firearm to the respondent; and21                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 22            that could be assembled to make an operable 23            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 24            have access to or control of the firearm and 25            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 26            operable firearm.   HB4312- 36 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            (F)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 2        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 3        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 4        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 5        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 6        hearing. 7            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 8        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:9                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 10            affidavit to the open court that: 11                    (I) the third party transferee does not 12                reside with the respondent; 13                    (II) the respondent does not have access 14                to the location in which the third party 15                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 16                firearm parts; 17                    (III) the third party transferee will not 18                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 19                respondent or anyone who resides with the 20                respondent; 21                    (IV) the third party transferee will 22                maintain control and possession of the firearm 23                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 24                the court; and 25                    (V) the third party transferee will be 26                subject to criminal penalties for transferring   HB4312- 37 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1                the firearms or firearm parts to the 2                respondent; and 3                (bb) the court finds that: 4                    (I) the respondent holds a valid Firearm 5                Owner's Identification; and6                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 7                parts to the third party transferee does not 8                place the petitioner or any other protected 9                parties at any additional threat or risk of 10                harm. 11        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If a domestic 12    violence order of protection prohibits respondent from 13    having contact with the minor child, or if petitioner's 14    address is omitted under subsection (b) of Section 112A-5 15    of this Code, or if necessary to prevent abuse or wrongful 16    removal or concealment of a minor child, the order shall 17    deny respondent access to, and prohibit respondent from 18    inspecting, obtaining, or attempting to inspect or obtain, 19    school or any other records of the minor child who is in 20    the care of petitioner.21        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 22    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 23    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 24    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 25    deemed reasonable by the court.26        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive   HB4312- 38 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 2    of a family or household member or to effectuate one of the 3    granted remedies, if supported by the balance of 4    hardships. If the harm to be prevented by the injunction 5    is abuse or any other harm that one of the remedies listed 6    in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this subsection is 7    designed to prevent, no further evidence is necessary to 8    establish that the harm is an irreparable injury.9        (18) Telephone services.10            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 11        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 12        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 13        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 14        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 15        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 16        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 17        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. In 18        this paragraph (18), the term "wireless telephone 19        service provider" means a provider of commercial 20        mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 332. The 21        petitioner may request the transfer of each telephone 22        number that the petitioner, or a minor child in his or 23        her custody, uses. The clerk of the court shall serve 24        the order on the wireless telephone service provider's 25        agent for service of process provided to the Illinois 26        Commerce Commission. The order shall contain all of   HB4312- 39 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        the following: 2                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 3            the account holder including the name of the 4            wireless telephone service provider that serves 5            the account.6                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 7            transferred.8                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 9            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 10            and right to the use of any telephone number 11            transferred under this paragraph.12            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 13        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 14        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 15        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 16        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 17        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 18        following applies:19                (i) The account holder named in the order has 20            terminated the account.21                (ii) A difference in network technology would 22            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 23            a network if the transfer occurs.24                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 25            other limitation on network or service provision 26            to the petitioner.  HB4312- 40 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1                (iv) Another technological or operational 2            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 3            telephone number if the transfer occurs.4            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 5        responsibility for and right to the use of any 6        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 7        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 8        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 9        mobile device associated with the number.10            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 11        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 12        requirements for establishing an account or 13        transferring a number, including requiring the 14        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 15        financial information, and customer preferences.16            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 17        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 18        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 19        with a court order issued under this paragraph.20            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 21        services to residential customers shall provide to the 22        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 23        an agent for service of orders entered under this 24        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 25        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 26        Commission within 30 days of such change.   HB4312- 41 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 2        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 3        each wireless telephone service provider on the 4        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 5        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 6        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 7        is provided and displayed. 8    (c) Relevant factors; findings.9        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 10    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 11    relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the 12    following:13            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern, and 14        consequences of the respondent's past abuse of the 15        petitioner or any family or household member, 16        including the concealment of his or her location in 17        order to evade service of process or notice, and the 18        likelihood of danger of future abuse to petitioner or 19        any member of petitioner's or respondent's family or 20        household; and21            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 22        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 23        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State, 24        or improperly separated from the child's primary 25        caretaker.26        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the   HB4312- 42 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 2    court shall consider relevant factors, including, but not 3    limited to, the following:4            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 5        adequacy, location, and other characteristics of 6        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 7        or dependent adult in the party's care;8            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and9            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 10        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 11        care, to family, school, church, and community.12        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 13    (4) of this subsection (c), the court shall make its 14    findings in an official record or in writing, and shall at 15    a minimum set forth the following:16            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 17        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 18        of this subsection (c).19            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 20        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 21        or continued abuse.22            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 23        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 24        other alleged abused persons.25        (4) (Blank).26        (5) Never married parties. No rights or   HB4312- 43 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 2    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 3    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 4    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 5    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 6    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 7    Act of 1975, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 8    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 9    administrative, or other act of another state or 10    territory, any other statute of this State, or by any 11    foreign nation establishing the father and child 12    relationship, any other proceeding substantially in 13    conformity with the federal Personal Responsibility and 14    Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, or when both 15    parties appeared in open court or at an administrative 16    hearing acknowledging under oath or admitting by 17    affirmation the existence of a father and child 18    relationship. Absent such an adjudication, no putative 19    father shall be granted temporary allocation of parental 20    responsibilities, including parenting time with the minor 21    child, or physical care and possession of the minor child, 22    nor shall an order of payment for support of the minor 23    child be entered.24    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 25that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 26a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of   HB4312- 44 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 2balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 3include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 4result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 5outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 6The findings shall be an official record or in writing.7    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 8based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:9        (1) respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 10    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 11    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;12        (2) respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;13        (3) petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 14    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 15    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 16    of 2012; 17        (4) petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 18    of another;19        (5) petitioner left the residence or household to 20    avoid further abuse by respondent;21        (6) petitioner did not leave the residence or 22    household to avoid further abuse by respondent; or 23        (7) conduct by any family or household member excused 24    the abuse by respondent, unless that same conduct would 25    have excused such abuse if the parties had not been family 26    or household members.  HB4312- 45 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.) 3    (725 ILCS 5/112A-20)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-20)4    Sec. 112A-20. Duration and extension of final protective 5orders. 6    (a) (Blank).7    (b) A final protective order shall remain in effect as 8follows:9        (1) if entered during pre-trial release, until 10    disposition, withdrawal, or dismissal of the underlying 11    charge; if, however, the case is continued as an 12    independent cause of action, the order's duration may be 13    for a fixed period of time not to exceed 2 years;14        (2) if in effect in conjunction with a bond forfeiture 15    warrant, until final disposition or an additional period 16    of time not exceeding 2 years; no domestic violence order 17    of protection, however, shall be terminated by a dismissal 18    that is accompanied by the issuance of a bond forfeiture 19    warrant;20        (3) until 2 years after the expiration of any 21    supervision, conditional discharge, probation, periodic 22    imprisonment, parole, aftercare release, or mandatory 23    supervised release for domestic violence orders of 24    protection and civil no contact orders;25        (4) until 2 years after the date set by the court for   HB4312- 46 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    expiration of any sentence of imprisonment and subsequent 2    parole, aftercare release, or mandatory supervised release 3    for domestic violence orders of protection and civil no 4    contact orders;5        (5) permanent for a stalking no contact order if a 6    judgment of conviction for stalking is entered; or 7        (6) permanent for a civil no contact order at the 8    victim's request if a judgment of conviction for criminal 9    sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 10    criminal sexual abuse, excluding a conviction under 11    subsection (c) of Section 11-1.50 of the Criminal Code of 12    2012, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse is entered. 13    (c) Computation of time. The duration of a domestic 14violence order of protection shall not be reduced by the 15duration of any prior domestic violence order of protection.16    (d) Law enforcement records. When a protective order 17expires upon the occurrence of a specified event, rather than 18upon a specified date as provided in subsection (b), no 19expiration date shall be entered in Illinois State Police 20records. To remove the protective order from those records, 21either the petitioner or the respondent shall request the 22clerk of the court to file a certified copy of an order stating 23that the specified event has occurred or that the protective 24order has been vacated or modified with the sheriff, and the 25sheriff shall direct that law enforcement records shall be 26promptly corrected in accordance with the filed order.  HB4312- 47 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    (e) Extension of Orders. Any domestic violence order of 2protection or civil no contact order that expires 2 years 3after the expiration of the defendant's sentence under 4paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subsection (b) of Section 5112A-20 of this Article may be extended one or more times, as 6required. The petitioner, petitioner's counsel, or the State's 7Attorney on the petitioner's behalf shall file the motion for 8an extension of the final protective order in the criminal 9case and serve the motion in accordance with Supreme Court 10Rules 11 and 12. The court shall transfer the motion to the 11appropriate court or division for consideration under 12subsection (e) of Section 220 of the Illinois Domestic 13Violence Act of 1986, subsection (c) of Section 216 of the 14Civil No Contact Order Act, or subsection (c) of Section 105 of 15the Stalking No Contact Order as appropriate.16        (1) Motion to extend plenary order. Any motion to 17    extend a plenary order must be filed on or before the 18    expiration date. When the motion is filed, the plenary 19    order remains in effect until its original expiration date 20    or until the motion is presented or heard, whichever is 21    later. Upon the timely filing of the motion, the clerk 22    shall transmit to law enforcement the motion and notice of 23    motion with the next court date in accordance with Section 24    112A-22. If the next court date is after the expiration 25    date of the original order, the next court date shall be 26    entered into LEADS as the updated expiration date of the   HB4312- 48 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    plenary order.2        (2) A plenary order shall be extended if the court 3    finds that since entry of the plenary order there has been 4    no material change in the relevant circumstances that met 5    the requirements of subsection (a) of Section 112A-14 and 6    Section 112A-19. An extension of a plenary order may be 7    granted for any fixed period of time or indefinitely until 8    the plenary order is vacated or modified.9        (3) If the motion to extend the plenary order is 10    uncontested, petitioner's motion or affidavit stating that 11    there has been no material change in relevant 12    circumstances since entry of the order and stating the 13    reason for the requested extension is sufficient for the 14    court to extend the plenary order for any length of time, 15    including indefinitely.16        (4) The court may grant a contested request for an 17    extension of the plenary order for more than 2 years based 18    on good cause shown. Good cause is established by the 19    facts of the original order, and a new finding that a 20    compelling reason related to the physical danger, 21    emotional distress, safety, or well-being of the 22    petitioner or other protected parties exists for the 23    extension. Good cause is not required for uncontested 24    requests for any duration or contested requests for 25    extensions up to 2 years.26        (5) A violation of the original order or a subsequent   HB4312- 49 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    incident of abuse is not required to grant the extension 2    or determine the length of the extension. Compliance with 3    the original order does not negate the basis or length of 4    the extension.5        (6) Any requested modification to the plenary order 6    independent from the length of the extension shall be 7    determined in accordance with the requirements of 8    subsection (a) of Section 112A-14 and 112A-19. 9    (f) Termination date. Any final protective order which 10would expire on a court holiday shall instead expire at the 11close of the next court business day.12    (g) Statement of purpose. The practice of dismissing or 13suspending a criminal prosecution in exchange for issuing a 14protective order undermines the purposes of this Article. This 15Section shall not be construed as encouraging that practice.16(Source: P.A. 102-184, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 17102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 18    Section 10. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 19amended by changing Sections 103, 212, 214, and 220 as 20follows: 21    (750 ILCS 60/103)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2311-3)22    Sec. 103. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act, the 23following terms shall have the following meanings:24    (1) "Abuse" means physical abuse, harassment, intimidation   HB4312- 50 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1of a dependent, interference with personal liberty or willful 2deprivation but does not include reasonable direction of a 3minor child by a parent or person in loco parentis.4    (2) "Adult with disabilities" means an elder adult with 5disabilities or a high-risk adult with disabilities. A person 6may be an adult with disabilities for purposes of this Act even 7though he or she has never been adjudicated an incompetent 8adult. However, no court proceeding may be initiated or 9continued on behalf of an adult with disabilities over that 10adult's objection, unless such proceeding is approved by his 11or her legal guardian, if any.12    (3) "Domestic violence" means abuse as defined in 13paragraph (1).14    (4) "Elder adult with disabilities" means an adult 15prevented by advanced age from taking appropriate action to 16protect himself or herself from abuse by a family or household 17member.18    (5) "Exploitation" means the illegal, including tortious, 19use of a high-risk adult with disabilities or of the assets or 20resources of a high-risk adult with disabilities. Exploitation 21includes, but is not limited to, the misappropriation of 22assets or resources of a high-risk adult with disabilities by 23undue influence, by breach of a fiduciary relationship, by 24fraud, deception, or extortion, or the use of such assets or 25resources in a manner contrary to law.26    (6) "Family or household members" include spouses, former   HB4312- 51 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1spouses, parents, children, stepchildren and other persons 2related by blood or by present or prior marriage, persons who 3share or formerly shared a common dwelling, persons who have 4or allegedly have a child in common, persons who share or 5allegedly share a blood relationship through a child, persons 6who have or have had a dating or engagement relationship, 7persons with disabilities and their personal assistants, and 8caregivers as defined in Section 12-4.4a of the Criminal Code 9of 2012. For purposes of this paragraph, neither a casual 10acquaintanceship nor ordinary fraternization between 2 11individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed to 12constitute a dating relationship. In the case of a high-risk 13adult with disabilities, "family or household members" 14includes any person who has the responsibility for a high-risk 15adult as a result of a family relationship or who has assumed 16responsibility for all or a portion of the care of a high-risk 17adult with disabilities voluntarily, or by express or implied 18contract, or by court order.19    (7) "Harassment" means knowing conduct which is not 20necessary to accomplish a purpose that is reasonable under the 21circumstances; would cause a reasonable person emotional 22distress; and does cause emotional distress to the petitioner. 23Unless the presumption is rebutted by a preponderance of the 24evidence, the following types of conduct shall be presumed to 25cause emotional distress: 26        (i) creating a disturbance at petitioner's place of   HB4312- 52 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    employment or school; 2        (ii) engaging in doxing as defined in the Civil 3    Liability for Doxing Act repeatedly telephoning 4    petitioner's place of employment, home or residence; 5        (iii) repeatedly following the petitioner including, 6    but not limited to, directly or indirectly through third 7    parties, by using an electronic tracking or monitoring 8    device, a system or other electronic means, or acquiring 9    tracking information to determine the petitioner's 10    location, movement or travel patterns without the 11    petitioner's knowledge or consent about in a public place 12    or places; 13        (iv) non-consensual creation, dissemination, or 14    threatening the dissemination of electronically generated 15    or digitally altered content directly or indirectly 16    pertaining to the petitioner or to the likeness of the 17    petitioner including, but not limited to, images of the 18    petitioner or the petitioner's voice repeatedly keeping 19    petitioner under surveillance by remaining present outside 20    his or her home, school, place of employment, vehicle or 21    other place occupied by petitioner or by peering in 22    petitioner's windows; 23        (v) repeatedly surveilling the petitioner directly or 24    indirectly including, but not limited to, by remaining 25    present at or outside the petitioner's home, school, place 26    of employment, vehicle, or other place occupied by   HB4312- 53 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    petitioner, by peering in petitioner's windows, through an 2    electronic tracking or monitoring device, a system or 3    other electronic means, or by acquiring tracking 4    information to determine the petitioner's location, 5    movement, or travel patterns without the petitioner's 6    knowledge and consent;7        (vi) non-consensual creation, dissemination or 8    threatening the non-consensual dissemination of private 9    sexual images and digitally altered sexual images as 10    defined in the Civil Remedies for Nonconsensual 11    Dissemination of Private Sexual Images Act;12        (vii) repeatedly contacting the petitioner directly or 13    indirectly through any means including, but not limited 14    to, telephonic, electronic or online;15        (viii) using an electronic tracking or monitoring, 16    device, a system or other electronic means, or acquiring 17    tracking information to determine the petitioner's 18    location, movement, or travel patterns without the 19    petitioner's knowledge or consent; 20        (ix) improperly concealing a minor child from 21    petitioner, repeatedly threatening to improperly remove a 22    minor child of petitioner's from the jurisdiction or from 23    the physical care of petitioner, repeatedly threatening to 24    conceal a minor child from petitioner, or making a single 25    such threat following an actual or attempted improper 26    removal or concealment, unless respondent was fleeing an   HB4312- 54 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    incident or pattern of domestic violence; or 2        (x) (vi) threatening physical force, confinement or 3    restraint on one or more occasions.4    (8) "High-risk adult with disabilities" means a person 5aged 18 or over whose physical or mental disability impairs 6his or her ability to seek or obtain protection from abuse, 7neglect, or exploitation.8    (9) "Interference with personal liberty" means committing 9or threatening physical abuse, harassment, intimidation or 10willful deprivation so as to compel another to engage in 11conduct from which she or he has a right to abstain or to 12refrain from conduct in which she or he has a right to engage.13    (10) "Intimidation of a dependent" means subjecting a 14person who is dependent because of age, health or disability 15to participation in or the witnessing of: physical force 16against another or physical confinement or restraint of 17another which constitutes physical abuse as defined in this 18Act, regardless of whether the abused person is a family or 19household member.20    (11) (A) "Neglect" means the failure to exercise that 21degree of care toward a high-risk adult with disabilities 22which a reasonable person would exercise under the 23circumstances and includes but is not limited to: 24        (i) the failure to take reasonable steps to protect a 25    high-risk adult with disabilities from acts of abuse; 26        (ii) the repeated, careless imposition of unreasonable   HB4312- 55 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    confinement; 2        (iii) the failure to provide food, shelter, clothing, 3    and personal hygiene to a high-risk adult with 4    disabilities who requires such assistance; 5        (iv) the failure to provide medical and rehabilitative 6    care for the physical and mental health needs of a 7    high-risk adult with disabilities; or 8        (v) the failure to protect a high-risk adult with 9    disabilities from health and safety hazards.10    (B) Nothing in this subsection (10) shall be construed to 11impose a requirement that assistance be provided to a 12high-risk adult with disabilities over his or her objection in 13the absence of a court order, nor to create any new affirmative 14duty to provide support to a high-risk adult with 15disabilities.16    (12) "Order of protection" means an emergency order, 17interim order or plenary order, granted pursuant to this Act, 18which includes any or all of the remedies authorized by 19Section 214 of this Act.20    (13) "Petitioner" may mean not only any named petitioner 21for the order of protection and any named victim of abuse on 22whose behalf the petition is brought, but also any other 23person protected by this Act.24    (14) "Physical abuse" includes sexual abuse and means any 25of the following: 26        (i) knowing or reckless use of physical force,   HB4312- 56 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    confinement or restraint; 2        (ii) knowing, repeated and unnecessary sleep 3    deprivation; or 4        (iii) knowing or reckless conduct which creates an 5    immediate risk of physical harm.6    (14.5) "Stay away" means for the respondent to refrain 7from both physical presence and nonphysical contact with the 8petitioner whether direct, indirect (including, but not 9limited to, telephone calls, mail, email, faxes, and written 10notes), or through third parties who may or may not know about 11the order of protection. 12    (15) "Willful deprivation" means wilfully denying a person 13who because of age, health or disability requires medication, 14medical care, shelter, accessible shelter or services, food, 15therapeutic device, or other physical assistance, and thereby 16exposing that person to the risk of physical, mental or 17emotional harm, except with regard to medical care or 18treatment when the dependent person has expressed an intent to 19forgo such medical care or treatment. This paragraph does not 20create any new affirmative duty to provide support to 21dependent persons.22(Source: P.A. 96-1551, eff. 7-1-11; 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 23    (750 ILCS 60/212)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-12)24    Sec. 212. Hearings. 25    (a) A petition for an order of protection shall be treated   HB4312- 57 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1as an expedited proceeding, and no court shall transfer or 2otherwise decline to decide all or part of such petition 3except as otherwise provided herein. Nothing in this Section 4shall prevent the court from reserving issues when 5jurisdiction or notice requirements are not met.6    (b) Any court or a division thereof which ordinarily does 7not decide matters of child custody and family support may 8decline to decide contested issues of physical care, custody, 9visitation, or family support unless a decision on one or more 10of those contested issues is necessary to avoid the risk of 11abuse, neglect, removal from the State or concealment within 12the State of the child or of separation of the child from the 13primary caretaker. If the court or division thereof has 14declined to decide any or all of these issues, then it shall 15transfer all undecided issues to the appropriate court or 16division. In the event of such a transfer, a government 17attorney involved in the criminal prosecution may, but need 18not, continue to offer counsel to the petitioner on 19transferred matters.20    (c) If the court transfers or otherwise declines to decide 21any issue, judgment on that issue shall be expressly reserved 22and ruling on other issues shall not be delayed or declined.23    (d) A court in a county with a population above 250,000 24shall offer the option of a remote hearing to a petitioner for 25an order of protection. The court has the discretion to grant 26or deny the request for a remote hearing for good cause shown.   HB4312- 58 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1Each court shall determine the procedure for a remote hearing. 2The petitioner, applicable witnesses, and respondent may 3appear remotely or in person.4    The court shall issue and publish a court order, standing 5order, or local rule detailing information about the process 6for requesting and participating in a remote court appearance. 7The court order, standing order, or local rule shall be 8published on the court's website and posted on signs 9throughout the courthouse, including in the clerk's office. 10The sign shall be written in plain language and include 11information about the availability of remote court appearances 12and the process for requesting a remote hearing. 13(Source: P.A. 102-853, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 14    (750 ILCS 60/214)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-14)15    Sec. 214. Order of protection; remedies. 16    (a) Issuance of order. If the court finds that petitioner 17has been abused by a family or household member or that 18petitioner is a high-risk adult who has been abused, 19neglected, or exploited, as defined in this Act, an order of 20protection prohibiting the abuse, neglect, or exploitation 21shall issue; provided that petitioner must also satisfy the 22requirements of one of the following Sections, as appropriate: 23Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on interim 24orders, or Section 219 on plenary orders. Petitioner shall not 25be denied an order of protection because petitioner or   HB4312- 59 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1respondent is a minor. The court, when determining whether or 2not to issue an order of protection, shall not require 3physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the victim. 4Modification and extension of prior orders of protection shall 5be in accordance with this Act.6    (b) Remedies and standards. The remedies to be included in 7an order of protection shall be determined in accordance with 8this Section and one of the following Sections, as 9appropriate: Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on 10interim orders, and Section 219 on plenary orders. The 11remedies listed in this subsection shall be in addition to 12other civil or criminal remedies available to petitioner.13        (1) Prohibition of abuse, neglect, or exploitation. 14    Prohibit respondent's harassment, interference with 15    personal liberty, intimidation of a dependent, physical 16    abuse, or willful deprivation, neglect or exploitation, as 17    defined in this Act, or stalking of the petitioner, as 18    defined in Section 12-7.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, if 19    such abuse, neglect, exploitation, or stalking has 20    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 21    prohibited.22        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 23    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 24    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 25    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 26    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive   HB4312- 60 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 2    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 3    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 4    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5    Marriage Act.6            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 7        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 8        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 9        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 10        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 11        person or entity other than the opposing party that 12        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 13        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 14        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.15            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 16        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 17        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 18        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 19        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 20        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 21        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 22        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 23        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 24        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 25        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 26        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance   HB4312- 61 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 2        the accessibility of the residence or household. 3        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 4        have a right to occupancy.5            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 6        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 7        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 8        that the hardships to respondent substantially 9        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 10        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 11        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 12        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 13        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 14        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 15        household.16        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 17    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 18    person protected by the order of protection, or prohibit 19    respondent from entering or remaining present at 20    petitioner's school, place of employment, or other 21    specified places at times when petitioner is present, or 22    both, if reasonable, given the balance of hardships. 23    Hardships need not be balanced for the court to enter a 24    stay away order or prohibit entry if respondent has no 25    right to enter the premises.26            (A) If an order of protection grants petitioner   HB4312- 62 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        exclusive possession of the residence, or prohibits 2        respondent from entering the residence, or orders 3        respondent to stay away from petitioner or other 4        protected persons, then the court may allow respondent 5        access to the residence to remove items of clothing 6        and personal adornment used exclusively by respondent, 7        medications, and other items as the court directs. The 8        right to access shall be exercised on only one 9        occasion as the court directs and in the presence of an 10        agreed-upon adult third party or law enforcement 11        officer.12            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 13        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 14        middle, or high school, the court when issuing an 15        order of protection and providing relief shall 16        consider the severity of the act, any continuing 17        physical danger or emotional distress to the 18        petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to the 19        petitioner and respondent under federal and State law, 20        the availability of a transfer of the respondent to 21        another school, a change of placement or a change of 22        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 23        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 24        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 25        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 26        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or   HB4312- 63 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 2        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 3        change of placement or change of program, as 4        determined by the school district or private or 5        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 6        respondent's movements within the school attended by 7        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 8        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 9        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 10        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 11        bears the burden of production with respect to the 12        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 13        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 14        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 15        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 16        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 17        agree with the school district's or private or 18        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 19        change of program or solely on the ground that the 20        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 21        does not take an action required to effectuate a 22        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 23        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 24        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 25        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 26        another attendance center within the respondent's   HB4312- 64 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        school district or private or non-public school, the 2        school district or private or non-public school shall 3        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 4        center to which the respondent is transferred. In the 5        event the court order results in a transfer of the 6        minor respondent to another attendance center, a 7        change in the respondent's placement, or a change of 8        the respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or 9        legal custodian of the respondent is responsible for 10        transportation and other costs associated with the 11        transfer or change. 12            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 13        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 14        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 15        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. In 16        the event the court orders a transfer of the 17        respondent to another school, the parents, guardian, 18        or legal custodian of the respondent is responsible 19        for transportation and other costs associated with the 20        change of school by the respondent. 21        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 22    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 23    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 24    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 25    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 26    agency providing services to elders, program designed for   HB4312- 65 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    domestic violence abusers or any other guidance service 2    the court deems appropriate. The Court may order the 3    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 4    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 5    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 6    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 7        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 8    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 9    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 10    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 11    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 12    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 13    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 14    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 15    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 16    in loco parentis.17        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 18    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 19    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 20    awarding physical care to respondent would not be in the 21    minor child's best interest.22        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities: 23    significant decision-making. Award temporary 24    decision-making responsibility to petitioner in accordance 25    with this Section, the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 26    of Marriage Act, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, and   HB4312- 66 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    this State's Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and 2    Enforcement Act. 3        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 4    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 5    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 6    awarding temporary significant decision-making 7    responsibility to respondent would not be in the child's 8    best interest.9        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 10    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 11    physical care or allocates temporary significant 12    decision-making responsibility of a minor child to 13    petitioner. The court shall restrict or deny respondent's 14    parenting time with a minor child if the court finds that 15    respondent has done or is likely to do any of the 16    following: (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 17    parenting time; (ii) use the parenting time as an 18    opportunity to abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's 19    family or household members; (iii) improperly conceal or 20    detain the minor child; or (iv) otherwise act in a manner 21    that is not in the best interests of the minor child. The 22    court shall not be limited by the standards set forth in 23    Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 24    Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting time, the 25    order shall specify dates and times for the parenting time 26    to take place or other specific parameters or conditions   HB4312- 67 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    that are appropriate. No order for parenting time shall 2    refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting time".3        Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 4    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 5    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 6    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 7    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 8    in a violent or abusive manner.9        If necessary to protect any member of petitioner's 10    family or household from future abuse, respondent shall be 11    prohibited from coming to petitioner's residence to meet 12    the minor child for parenting time, and the parties shall 13    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 14    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 15    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 16    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 17    acknowledging accountability to the court.18        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 19    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 20    concealing the child within the State.21        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 22    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 23    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 24    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner or to 25    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 26    child or the respondent.  HB4312- 68 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 2    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 3    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 4    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:5            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 6        property; or7            (ii) the parties own the property jointly; sharing 8        it would risk abuse of petitioner by respondent or is 9        impracticable; and the balance of hardships favors 10        temporary possession by petitioner.11        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 12    property is that it is marital property, the court may 13    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 14    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 15    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 16    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 17    hereafter amended.18        No order under this provision shall affect title to 19    property.20        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 21    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 22    damaging or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 23    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 24    if:25            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 26        property; or  HB4312- 69 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            (ii) the parties own the property jointly, and the 2        balance of hardships favors granting this remedy.3        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 4    property is that it is marital property, the court may 5    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 6    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 7    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 8    now or hereafter amended.9        The court may further prohibit respondent from 10    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 11    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 12    advantage of respondent or of any other person.13        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 14    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 15    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 16    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 17    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 18    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 19    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 20    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 21    otherwise disposing of the animal. 22        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 23    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 24    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 25    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 26    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance   HB4312- 70 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 2    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 3    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 4    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 5    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 6    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 7    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 8    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 9    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 10    responsibility differently and vacating the petitioner's 11    significant decision-making authority, unless otherwise 12    provided in the order.13        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 14    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 15    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Such losses shall 16    include, but not be limited to, medical expenses, lost 17    earnings or other support, repair or replacement of 18    property damaged or taken, reasonable attorney's fees, 19    court costs and moving or other travel expenses, including 20    additional reasonable expenses for temporary shelter and 21    restaurant meals.22            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 23        entitled to seek maintenance, child support or 24        property distribution from the other party under the 25        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 26        now or hereafter amended, the court may order   HB4312- 71 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 2        the extent that such reimbursement would be 3        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 4        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.5            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 6        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 7        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 8        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 9        and recovery of the minor child, including but not 10        limited to legal fees, court costs, private 11        investigator fees, and travel costs.12        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 13    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 14    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 15    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 16    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.17        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 18    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearms 19    parts.20            (A)(i) Prohibit a respondent against whom an 21        emergency, interim, or plenary order of protection was 22        issued from possessing, during the duration of the 23        order, any firearms or firearm parts that could be 24        assembled into an operable firearm if a search warrant 25        is issued under (A-1) or the order:26                (aa) was issued after a hearing of which such   HB4312- 72 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            person received actual notice, and at which such 2            person had an opportunity to participate, or the 3            petitioner has satisfied the requirements of 4            Section 217;5                (bb) restrains such person from using physical 6            force; harassing, stalking, or threatening an 7            intimate partner of such person or child of such 8            intimate partner or person; or engaging in other 9            conduct that would place an intimate partner in 10            reasonable fear of bodily injury to the partner or 11            child; and12                (cc) includes a finding that such person 13            represents a credible threat to the physical 14            safety of such intimate partner or child.15            (ii) The court shall order any respondent 16        prohibited from possessing firearms under item (i) of 17        subparagraph (A) to surrender any firearms or firearm 18        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 19        firearm. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 20        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 21        be surrendered to the serving officers at the time of 22        service of the order of protection, and any other 23        firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered to 24        local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 25        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 26        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the   HB4312- 73 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 2        subparagraph (B), shall also be ordered by the court 3        to be turned over to the officer serving the order of 4        protection at the time of service or, if not on the 5        respondent's person or at the location where the 6        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 7        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 8        order of protection. The law enforcement agency shall 9        immediately mail the card, as well as any license, to 10        the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 11        Identification Card Office for safekeeping. 12            (A-1)(i) Upon issuance of an emergency, interim, 13        or plenary order of protection and subject to the 14        provisions of item (ii) of this subparagraph (A-1), 15        the court shall issue a search warrant for the seizure 16        of any firearms or firearm parts that could be 17        assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to the 18        respondent if the court, based upon sworn testimony, 19        finds that: 20                (aa) the respondent poses a credible threat to 21            the physical safety of the petitioner protected by 22            the order of protection; and 23                (bb) probable cause exists to believe that:24                    (I) the respondent possesses firearms or 25                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 26                an operable firearm;  HB4312- 74 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1                    (II) the firearms or firearm parts that 2                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 3                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 4                other property of the respondent to be 5                searched; and6                    (III) the credible threat to the physical 7                safety of the petitioner protected by the 8                order of protection is immediate and present. 9            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 10        determining whether the search warrant shall be 11        issued. 12            (ii) If the petitioner does not seek a warrant 13        under this subparagraph (A-1) or the court determines 14        that the requirements of this subparagraph (A-1) have 15        not been met, relief under subparagraph (A) alone may 16        be granted. 17            (iii) An ex parte search warrant shall be granted 18        under this subparagraph (A-1) only if the court finds 19        that:20                (aa) the elements of item (i) of subparagraph 21            (A-1) have been met;22                (bb) personal injury to the petitioner is 23            likely to occur if the respondent received prior 24            notice; and25                (cc) the petitioner has otherwise satisfied 26            the requirements of Section 217 of this Act.   HB4312- 75 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            (iv) Oral testimony is sufficient in lieu of an 2        affidavit to support a finding of probable cause. 3            (v) A search warrant issued under this 4        subparagraph (A-1) shall be directed by the court for 5        enforcement to the law enforcement agency with primary 6        responsibility for responding to calls for service at 7        the location to be searched or to another appropriate 8        law enforcement agency if justified by the 9        circumstances. The search warrant shall specify with 10        particularity the scope of the search, including the 11        property to be searched, and shall direct the law 12        enforcement agency to seize the respondent's firearms 13        and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 14        operable firearm. Law enforcement shall also be 15        directed to seize any Firearm Owner's Identification 16        Card and any Concealed Carry License belonging to the 17        respondent.18             (vi) The petitioner shall prepare an information 19        sheet, reviewed by the court, for law enforcement at 20        the time the warrant is granted. The information sheet 21        shall include:22                (aa) contact information for the petitioner, 23            the petitioner's attorney, or both, including a 24            telephone number and email, if available;25                (bb) a physical description of the respondent, 26            including the respondent's date of birth, if   HB4312- 76 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            known, or approximate age, height, weight, race, 2            and hair color;3                (cc) days and times that the respondent is 4            likely to be at the property to be searched, if 5            known; and6                (dd) whether people other than the respondent 7            are likely to be present at the property to be 8            searched and when, if known. 9            (vii) The information sheet shall be transmitted 10        to the law enforcement agency to which the search 11        warrant is directed in the same manner as the warrant 12        is transmitted under Section 222 of this Act. 13            (viii) If the court, after determining a search 14        warrant should issue, finds that the petitioner has 15        made a credible report of domestic violence to the 16        local law enforcement agency within the previous 90 17        days, law enforcement shall execute the warrant no 18        later than 96 hours after receipt of the warrant. If 19        the court finds that petitioner has not made such a 20        report, the law enforcement agency to which the court 21        has directed the warrant shall, within 48 hours of 22        receipt, evaluate the warrant and seek any corrections 23        to the warrant, and, if applicable, add to or negate 24        the warrant. The record shall reflect the court's 25        findings in determining whether to correct, add, or 26        negate the warrant. If a change is made regarding the   HB4312- 77 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        search warrant, law enforcement shall execute the 2        warrant no later than 96 hours after the correction is 3        issued. The law enforcement agency shall notify the 4        petitioner of any changes to the warrant or if the 5        warrant has been negated. The law enforcement agency 6        to which the court has directed the warrant may 7        coordinate with other law enforcement agencies to 8        execute the warrant. A return of the warrant shall be 9        filed by the law enforcement agency within 24 hours of 10        execution, setting forth the time, date, and location 11        where the warrant was executed and what items, if any, 12        were seized. If the court is not in session, the return 13        information shall be returned on the next date the 14        court is in session. Subject to the provisions of this 15        Section, peace officers shall have the same authority 16        to execute a warrant issued pursuant to this 17        subsection as a warrant issued under Article 108 of 18        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 19            (ix) Upon discovering a defect in the search 20        warrant, the appropriate law enforcement agency may 21        petition the court to correct the warrant. The law 22        enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner of any 23        such correction. 24            (x) Upon petition by the appropriate law 25        enforcement agency, the court may modify the search 26        warrant or extend the time to execute the search   HB4312- 78 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        warrant for a period of no more than 96 hours. In 2        determining whether to modify or extend the warrant, 3        the court shall consider:4                (aa) any increased risk to the petitioner's 5            safety that may result from a modification or 6            extension of the warrant;7                (bb) any unnecessary risk to law enforcement 8            that would be mitigated by a modification or 9            extension of the warrant;10                (cc) any risks to third parties at the 11            location to be searched that would be mitigated by 12            a modification or extension of the warrant; and13                (dd) the likelihood of successful execution of 14            warrant.15            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 16        determining whether to extend or modify the warrant. 17        The law enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner 18        of any modification or extension of the warrant. 19            (xi) Service of any order of protection shall, to 20        the extent possible, be concurrent with the execution 21        of any search warrant under this paragraph. 22            (B) If the respondent is a peace officer as 23        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 24        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 25        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 26        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law   HB4312- 79 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 2        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 3        for safekeeping for the duration of the order of 4        protection.5            (C)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 6        assembled to make an operable firearm shall be kept by 7        the law enforcement agency that took possession of the 8        items for safekeeping, except as provided in 9        subparagraph (B). The period of safekeeping shall be 10        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 11        provided in subparagraph (E), the respondent is 12        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 13        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 14        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 15        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 16        the court describing any seized or surrendered 17        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 18        that the respondent may seek the return of the 19        respondent's items at the end of the order of 20        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 21        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 22        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 23        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 24        under this subsection.25            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 26        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm   HB4312- 80 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 2        and notify the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 3        Identification Card Office at the end of the Order of 4        Protection.5            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 6        respondent may request the return of any seized or 7        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 8        assembled to make an operable firearm. Such firearms 9        or firearm parts shall be returned within 14 days of 10        the request to the respondent, if the respondent is 11        lawfully eligible to possess firearms, or to a 12        designated third party who is lawfully eligible to 13        possess firearms. If the firearms or firearm parts 14        cannot be returned to respondent because (1) the 15        respondent has not requested the return or transfer of 16        the firearms or firearm parts as set forth in this 17        subparagraph, and (2) the respondent cannot be located 18        or fails to respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve 19        the firearms or firearm parts the court may, or is not 20        lawfully eligible to possess a firearm, upon petition 21        from the appropriate law enforcement agency and notice 22        to the respondent at the respondent's last known 23        address, order the law enforcement agency to destroy 24        the firearms or firearm parts; use the firearms or 25        firearm parts for training purposes or for any other 26        application as deemed appropriate by the law   HB4312- 81 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        enforcement agency; or turn over the firearm or 2        firearm parts to a third party who is lawfully 3        eligible to possess firearms, and who does not reside 4        with respondent. 5            (D)(i) If a person other than the respondent 6        claims title to any firearms and firearm parts that 7        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 8        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 9        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 10        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 11        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 12        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 13        petition, the court determines the person to be the 14        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 15        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 16        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 17        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 18        person, provided that: 19                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 20            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 21            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 22            possession and the lawful owner agrees to store 23            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 24            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 25            such that the respondent does not have access to 26            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that   HB4312- 82 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 2            and3                 (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 4            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 5            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 6            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 7        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 8        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 9        affirm by affidavit that he or she:10                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 11            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 12            operable firearm;13                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 14            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 15            operable firearm to the respondent; and16                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 17            that could be assembled to make an operable 18            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 19            have access to or control of the firearm and 20            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 21            operable firearm. 22            (E)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 23        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 24        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 25        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 26        petitioner and the third party must appear at the   HB4312- 83 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        hearing. 2            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 3        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:4                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 5            affidavit to the open court that: 6                    (I) the third party transferee does not 7                reside with the respondent; 8                    (II) the respondent does not have access 9                to the location in which the third party 10                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 11                firearm parts; 12                    (III) the third party transferee will not 13                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 14                respondent or anyone who resides with the 15                respondent; 16                    (IV) the third party transferee will 17                maintain control and possession of the firearm 18                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 19                the court; and 20                    (V) the third party transferee will be 21                subject to criminal penalties for transferring 22                the firearms or firearm parts to the 23                respondent; and 24                (bb) the court finds that: 25                    (I) the respondent holds a valid Firearm 26                Owner's Identification; and  HB4312- 84 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 2                parts to the third party transferee does not 3                place the petitioner or any other protected 4                parties at any additional threat or risk of 5                harm. 6        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If an order of 7    protection prohibits respondent from having contact with 8    the minor child, or if petitioner's address is omitted 9    under subsection (b) of Section 203, or if necessary to 10    prevent abuse or wrongful removal or concealment of a 11    minor child, the order shall deny respondent access to, 12    and prohibit respondent from inspecting, obtaining, or 13    attempting to inspect or obtain, school or any other 14    records of the minor child who is in the care of 15    petitioner.16        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 17    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 18    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 19    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 20    deemed reasonable by the court.21        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 22    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 23    of a family or household member or further abuse, neglect, 24    or exploitation of a high-risk adult with disabilities or 25    to effectuate one of the granted remedies, if supported by 26    the balance of hardships. If the harm to be prevented by   HB4312- 85 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    the injunction is abuse or any other harm that one of the 2    remedies listed in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this 3    subsection is designed to prevent, no further evidence is 4    necessary that the harm is an irreparable injury.5        (18) Telephone services.6            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 7        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 8        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 9        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 10        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 11        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 12        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 13        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. 14        For purposes of this paragraph (18), the term 15        "wireless telephone service provider" means a provider 16        of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 17        332. The petitioner may request the transfer of each 18        telephone number that the petitioner, or a minor child 19        in his or her custody, uses. The clerk of the court 20        shall serve the order on the wireless telephone 21        service provider's agent for service of process 22        provided to the Illinois Commerce Commission. The 23        order shall contain all of the following:24                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 25            the account holder including the name of the 26            wireless telephone service provider that serves   HB4312- 86 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1            the account.2                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 3            transferred.4                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 5            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 6            and right to the use of any telephone number 7            transferred under this paragraph.8            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 9        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 10        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 11        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 12        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 13        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 14        following applies:15                (i) The account holder named in the order has 16            terminated the account.17                (ii) A difference in network technology would 18            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 19            a network if the transfer occurs.20                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 21            other limitation on network or service provision 22            to the petitioner.23                (iv) Another technological or operational 24            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 25            telephone number if the transfer occurs.26            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial   HB4312- 87 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        responsibility for and right to the use of any 2        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 3        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 4        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 5        mobile device associated with the number.6            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 7        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 8        requirements for establishing an account or 9        transferring a number, including requiring the 10        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 11        financial information, and customer preferences.12            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 13        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 14        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 15        with a court order issued under this paragraph.16            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 17        services to residential customers shall provide to the 18        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 19        an agent for service of orders entered under this 20        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 21        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 22        Commission within 30 days of such change. 23            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 24        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 25        each wireless telephone service provider on the 26        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with   HB4312- 88 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 2        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 3        is provided and displayed. 4        (19) Require the respondent to cease harassment. 5    Require the respondent to:6            (A) stop creating, using, disseminating and delete 7        the following harassing conduct:8                (i) any and all material or statements that 9            constitute harassment under this Act, including, 10            but not limited to, doxing, electronically 11            generated or digitally altered content, sexual 12            private images and digitally altered sexual 13            images; and14                (ii) any and all electronic tracking or 15            monitoring devices, system or other electronic 16            means, or tracking information; and17            (B) present sufficient evidence that such 18        compliance has occurred. 19    (c) Relevant factors; findings.20        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 21    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 22    relevant factors, including but not limited to the 23    following:24            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern and 25        consequences of the respondent's past abuse, neglect 26        or exploitation of the petitioner or any family or   HB4312- 89 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        household member, including the concealment of his or 2        her location in order to evade service of process or 3        notice, and the likelihood of danger of future abuse, 4        neglect, or exploitation to petitioner or any member 5        of petitioner's or respondent's family or household; 6        and7            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 8        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 9        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State or 10        improperly separated from the child's primary 11        caretaker.12        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 13    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 14    court shall consider relevant factors, including but not 15    limited to the following:16            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 17        adequacy, location and other characteristics of 18        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 19        or dependent adult in the party's care;20            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and21            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 22        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 23        care, to family, school, church and community.24        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 25    (4) of this subsection, the court shall make its findings 26    in an official record or in writing, and shall at a minimum   HB4312- 90 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    set forth the following:2            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 3        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 4        of this subsection.5            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 6        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 7        or continued abuse.8            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 9        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 10        other alleged abused persons.11        (4) For purposes of issuing an ex parte emergency 12    order of protection, the court, as an alternative to or as 13    a supplement to making the findings described in 14    paragraphs (c)(3)(i) through (c)(3)(iii) of this 15    subsection, may use the following procedure:16        When a verified petition for an emergency order of 17    protection in accordance with the requirements of Sections 18    203 and 217 is presented to the court, the court shall 19    examine petitioner on oath or affirmation. An emergency 20    order of protection shall be issued by the court if it 21    appears from the contents of the petition and the 22    examination of petitioner that the averments are 23    sufficient to indicate abuse by respondent and to support 24    the granting of relief under the issuance of the emergency 25    order of protection.26        (5) Never married parties. No rights or   HB4312- 91 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 2    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 3    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 4    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 5    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 6    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 7    Act of 1975, the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of 8    Support Act, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 9    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 10    administrative, or other act of another state or 11    territory, any other Illinois statute, or by any foreign 12    nation establishing the father and child relationship, any 13    other proceeding substantially in conformity with the 14    Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 15    Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. 104-193), or where 16    both parties appeared in open court or at an 17    administrative hearing acknowledging under oath or 18    admitting by affirmation the existence of a father and 19    child relationship. Absent such an adjudication, finding, 20    or acknowledgment, no putative father shall be granted 21    temporary allocation of parental responsibilities, 22    including parenting time with the minor child, or physical 23    care and possession of the minor child, nor shall an order 24    of payment for support of the minor child be entered.25    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 26that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of   HB4312- 92 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 2subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 3balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 4include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 5result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 6outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 7The findings shall be an official record or in writing.8    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 9based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:10        (1) Respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 11    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 12    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;13        (2) Respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;14        (3) Petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 15    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 16    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 17    of 2012; 18        (4) Petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 19    of another;20        (5) Petitioner left the residence or household to 21    avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation by 22    respondent;23        (6) Petitioner did not leave the residence or 24    household to avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation 25    by respondent;26        (7) Conduct by any family or household member excused   HB4312- 93 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation by respondent, unless 2    that same conduct would have excused such abuse, neglect, 3    or exploitation if the parties had not been family or 4    household members.5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.) 6    (750 ILCS 60/220)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-20)7    Sec. 220. Duration and extension of orders. 8    (a) Duration of emergency and interim orders. Unless 9re-opened or extended or voided by entry of an order of greater 10duration:11        (1) Emergency orders issued under Section 217 shall be 12    effective for not less than 14 nor more than 21 days;13        (2) Interim orders shall be effective for up to 30 14    days.15    (b) Duration of plenary orders.16        (0.05) A plenary order of protection entered under 17    this Act shall be valid for a fixed period of time, not to 18    exceed two years.19        (1) A plenary order of protection entered in 20    conjunction with another civil proceeding shall remain in 21    effect as follows:22            (i) if entered as preliminary relief in that other 23        proceeding, until entry of final judgment in that 24        other proceeding;25            (ii) if incorporated into the final judgment in   HB4312- 94 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1        that other proceeding, until the order of protection 2        is vacated or modified; or3            (iii) if incorporated in an order for involuntary 4        commitment, until termination of both the involuntary 5        commitment and any voluntary commitment, or for a 6        fixed period of time not exceeding 2 years.7        (2) Duration of an order of protection entered in 8    conjunction with a criminal prosecution or delinquency 9    petition shall remain in effect as provided in Section 10    112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.11    (c) Computation of time. The duration of an order of 12protection shall not be reduced by the duration of any prior 13order of protection.14    (d) Law enforcement records. When a plenary order of 15protection expires upon the occurrence of a specified event, 16rather than upon a specified date as provided in subsection 17(b), no expiration date shall be entered in Illinois State 18Police records. To remove the plenary order from those 19records, either party shall request the clerk of the court to 20file a certified copy of an order stating that the specified 21event has occurred or that the plenary order has been vacated 22or modified with the Sheriff, and the Sheriff shall direct 23that law enforcement records shall be promptly corrected in 24accordance with the filed order.25    (e) Extension of orders. Any emergency, interim or plenary 26order may be extended one or more times, as required, provided   HB4312- 95 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1that the requirements of Section 217, 218 or 219, as 2appropriate, are satisfied. If the motion for extension is 3uncontested and petitioner seeks no modification of the order, 4the order may be extended on the basis of petitioner's motion 5or affidavit stating that there has been no material change in 6relevant circumstances since entry of the order and stating 7the reason for the requested extension. An extension of a 8plenary order of protection may be granted, upon good cause 9shown, to remain in effect until the order of protection is 10vacated or modified. Extensions may be granted only in open 11court and not under the provisions of subsection (c) of 12Section 217, which applies only when the court is unavailable 13at the close of business or on a court holiday.14        (1) Motion to extend plenary order. Any motion to 15    extend a plenary order must be filed on or before the 16    expiration date. When the motion is filed, the plenary 17    order remains in effect until its original expiration date 18    or until the motion is presented or heard, whichever is 19    later. Upon the timely filing of the motion, the clerk 20    shall transmit to law enforcement the motion and notice of 21    motion with the next court date in accordance with 22    subsection (b) of Section 222. If the next court date is 23    after the expiration date of the original order, the next 24    court date shall be entered into LEADS as the updated 25    expiration date of the plenary order.26        (2) A plenary order shall be extended if the court   HB4312- 96 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    finds that since entry of the plenary order there has been 2    no material change in the relevant circumstances that met 3    the requirements of Section 214. An extension of a plenary 4    order may be granted for any fixed period of time or 5    indefinitely until the plenary order is vacated or 6    modified.7        (3) If the motion to extend the plenary order is 8    uncontested, petitioner's motion or affidavit stating that 9    there has been no material change in relevant 10    circumstances since entry of the order and stating the 11    reason for the requested extension is sufficient for the 12    court to extend the plenary order for any length of time, 13    including indefinitely.14        (4) The court may grant a contested request for an 15    extension of the plenary order for more than 2 years based 16    on good cause shown. Good cause is established by the 17    facts of the original order, and a new finding that a 18    compelling reason related to the physical danger, 19    emotional distress, safety, or well-being of the 20    petitioner or other protected parties exists for the 21    extension. Good cause is not required for uncontested 22    requests for any duration or contested requests for 23    extensions up to 2 years.24        (5) A violation of the original order or a subsequent 25    incident of abuse is not required to grant the extension 26    or determine the length of the extension. Compliance with   HB4312- 97 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1    the original order does not negate the basis or length of 2    the extension.3        (6) Any requested modification to the plenary order 4    independent from the length of the extension shall be 5    determined in accordance with the requirements of Section 6    224. 7    (f) Termination date. Any order of protection which would 8expire on a court holiday shall instead expire at the close of 9the next court business day.10    (g) Statement of purpose. The practice of dismissing or 11suspending a criminal prosecution in exchange for the issuance 12of an order of protection undermines the purposes of this Act. 13This Section shall not be construed as encouraging that 14practice.15(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)  HB4312- 98 -LRB104 17114 JRC 30533 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    725 ILCS 5/112A-3from Ch. 38, par. 112A-34    725 ILCS 5/112A-5.55    725 ILCS 5/112A-14from Ch. 38, par. 112A-146    725 ILCS 5/112A-20from Ch. 38, par. 112A-207    750 ILCS 60/103from Ch. 40, par. 2311-38    750 ILCS 60/212from Ch. 40, par. 2312-129    750 ILCS 60/214from Ch. 40, par. 2312-1410    750 ILCS 60/220from Ch. 40, par. 2312-20